Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 148 Parks and Tourism
148.056.
Commissioner of parks may commission park rangers — Powers as peace officers.

The commissioner of parks, in his discretion, may employ and commission park rangers as the commissioner deems necessary to secure the parks and property of the Department of Parks and to maintain law and order and such employees, when so commissioned, shall have all of the powers of peace officers and shall have on all parks property and on public highways transversing such property in all parts of the state the same powers with respect to criminal matters and enforcement of the laws relating thereto as sheriffs, constables and police officers in their respective jurisdictions, and shall possess all the immunities and matters of defense now available or hereafter made available to sheriffs, constables and police officers in any suit brought against them in consequence of acts done in the course of their employment.

The designation of any such employee as a peace officer shall be governed by the provisions of KRS 61.300 except that he shall not be required to have resided in the county wherein he is to serve for a period of at least two (2) years, and he shall be required to file his photograph and affidavit only with the Franklin county clerk.

Any employee so commissioned shall be required to execute bond, subject to the provisions of KRS 62.170, for the faithful and lawful performance of his duties.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 6; 1972, ch. 217, § 1; 1980, ch. 188, § 111, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 295, § 23, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 343, § 21, effective July 15, 1982.

148.060.
Department may condemn lands;
contracts in name of Commonwealth. [Repealed.]

148.061.
Acquisition of property by condemnation; titles, approval. [Repealed.]

148.066.
Acceptance of park property — Title — Use.

The Department of Parks shall accept for the state any real estate or personal property conveyed or dedicated for public park purposes to the state or to the department or to its predecessor, but the department is not compelled to accept any such property if it deems it unwise to do so.

The title to all property that has been, or shall be, acquired by the Commonwealth or its agency for public park purposes shall be vested in the Commonwealth. Such property shall be managed, maintained, and improved by the Department of Parks for public park purposes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 8.

148.070.
Attorney General to institute condemnation proceedings. [Repealed.]

148.071.
Attorney General to prosecute condemnation suits; parties. [Repealed.]

148.080.
My Old Kentucky Home. [Repealed.]

148.085.
Boonesboro State Park. [Repealed.]

148.090.
Kentucky National Park Commission; powers. [Repealed.]

148.100.
Membership and organization of National Park Commission. [Repealed.]

148.110.
Parks Board to acquire lands and convey them to United States. [Repealed.]

148.111.
State Property and Buildings Commission to promote national parks — Agreements — Powers.

The State Property and Buildings Commission is hereby authorized and directed to further the establishment of national parks in such areas in Kentucky as the Congress of the United States designates. To accomplish that purpose, the commission may enter into agreements with the United States relating to the survey, location, and conveyance of property acquired by the commission for that purpose. It may fully cooperate with the United States and do all necessary acts to provide for the establishment of national parks under such terms as are provided by any relative Act of Congress. To accomplish this end the commission shall acquire land, caves, cave rights, leasehold interests, money and other property for public park purposes and to convey them to the United States for the establishment of national parks. The commission may do such other acts necessary to promote and accomplish its purpose. The acts of the commission shall be the acts of the state.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 13.

148.120.
Parks Board may condemn property. [Repealed.]

148.121.
Condemnation of land designated by United States for parks — Procedure.

The commission may condemn any land or any interest in land within areas designated by the United States for park sites. Condemnation proceedings shall be exercised in accordance with the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky. No condemnation proceedings shall impose on the state any liability for which provision has not previously been made. The commission shall also pay the expenses of condemnation proceedings, judgments and awards in condemnation proceedings, and other expenses necessary to acquire property.

The action shall be brought in the Circuit Court where the property lies by the Attorney General, and the county attorney of that county at the direction of the Attorney General shall assist in the prosecution of said action.

It shall not be mandatory for the commission to take the property at the price fixed by the jury or court judgment. However, in case the commission does not take the property, and perform all requirements of the judgment rendered by the court, then and in that event said commission shall pay the property owner all expenses as he may have incurred incident to the law suit, including attorney’s fees, and the property owner may have judgment in the original action upon filing proper proof thereof with the court.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 14; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 160, effective January 2, 1978.

148.130.
Parks Board may receive donations and collect subscriptions. [Repealed.]

148.131.
Commission may accept property for national park purposes.

The commission may receive by gift or purchase and hold any property or money for the purpose of establishing national parks, and may use such gifts in the purchase of real estate interests therein needed for proposed national parks. It may also dispose of any property so accepted by it, and use the proceeds or consideration received, in the acquisition of other real estate for national park purposes. The commission may also take over assets assigned to it by any private corporation formed and conducted for the purpose of acquiring and establishing national parks. The commission may collect any delinquent contributions or subscriptions or other obligations turned over to it, whether they have been made directly to the commission or acquired by assignment to it.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 15.

148.140.
Conveyances to the United States. [Repealed.]

148.141.
Conveyances to the United States, conditions.

Conveyances to the United States shall be made on the condition that the government of the United States administer, protect and develop the property for national park purposes, in accordance with federal laws regulating national parks.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 16.

148.150.
Parks Board may adopt regulations. [Repealed.]

148.151.
Regulations for handling national park property.

The commission may adopt and enforce lawful regulations for the proper administration and disposition of any property to which it may acquire title or over which it may gain control previous to the conveyance thereof to the United States.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 17.

148.160.
Condemnation of land by association for memorial purposes. [Repealed.]

148.161.
Civil War cemeteries, maintenance, acquisition by department — Expenditures limited.

Upon the request of the public body or private entity owning or controlling a Civil War cemetery, the Department of Parks may, as to a cemetery other than those mentioned in subsection (2) of this section, maintain a cemetery in an appropriate manner and may take title in the name of the Commonwealth to such cemetery by a deed of conveyance, subject to the appropriate sections of KRS Chapters 45 and 56. As used herein, the term, “Civil War cemetery” means a cemetery, or separate part of a cemetery, in which twenty-five (25) or more soldiers who fought in the war between the states are interred.

The Department of Parks shall maintain or take title to any of the following cemeteries upon formal request of the owning or controlling entity:

Expenditures by the Department of Parks for the purposes of this section shall not exceed twelve hundred dollars ($1,200) annually.

Pewee Valley Confederate Cemetery, Oldham County.

Goodnight Farm Confederate Cemetery, Boyle County.

Zollicoffer Park Confederate Cemetery, Pulaski County.

Camp Beauregard Cemetery, Graves County.

History.
Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 18, §§ 1 to 3.

148.163.
Title to and maintenance of covered wooden bridges. [Repealed.]

148.170.
Appropriations by counties to World War memorial. [Repealed.]

148.171.
State aid for establishment of county and city parks, limits — Use of funds. [Repealed.]

148.180.
Acquisition of Simon Bolivar Buckner Farm for state park; appropriation. [Repealed.]

148.190.
Acquisition of Francis Berry house for removal to Lincoln Homestead Park; appropriation. [Repealed.]

148.200.
Maintenance of grounds of Old State Capitol. [Repealed.]

148.210.
Old Governor’s Mansion, restoration and use as museum. [Repealed.]

148.220.
Compact with Virginia for Breaks Interstate Park.

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 82, § 1; 1964, ch. 98, § 1; 1994, ch. 22, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

The Governor is hereby authorized and directed to execute, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, the following compact with the Commonwealth of Virginia which is hereby approved, ratified and enacted into law:

BREAKS INTERSTATE PARK COMPACT

Pursuant to authority granted by an Act of the 83rd Congress of the United States, being Public Law 275, approved August 14, 1953, the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the Commonwealth of Virginia do hereby covenant and agree as follows:

ARTICLE I.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky and the Commonwealth of Virginia agree to create, develop and operate an interstate park to be known as The Breaks Interstate Park, which shall be located along the Russell Fork of the Levisa Fork of the Big Sandy River and on adjacent areas in Pike County, Kentucky, and Dickenson and Buchanan counties, Virginia. Said park shall be of such area and of such character as may be determined by the commission created by this compact.

ARTICLE II.

There is hereby created The Breaks Interstate Park Commission, which shall be a body corporate with the powers and duties set forth herein and such additional powers as may be conferred upon it by subsequent action of the appropriate authorities of Kentucky and Virginia. The commission shall consist of the Director of the Virginia Department of Conservation and Recreation or his designee and the Commissioner of the Kentucky Department of Parks or his designee as voting, ex officio members and three commissioners from each of the two states, each of whom shall be a citizen of the state he shall represent. Members of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor. Vacancies shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term. The term of the commissioners appointed by the Governor shall be for four years. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor is appointed and qualified. An officer or employee of the state, a political subdivision or the United States government may be appointed a commissioner under this compact.

ARTICLE III.

The commission created herein shall be a joint corporate instrumentality of both the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the Commonwealth of Virginia for the purpose of effecting the objects of this compact, and shall be deemed to be performing governmental functions of the two states in the performance of its duties hereunder. The commission shall have power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, to use a common seal and to make and adopt suitable bylaws, rules and regulations. The commission shall have the authority to acquire by gift, purchase or otherwise real estate and other property, and to dispose of such real estate and other property. Each Commonwealth agrees that it will authorize the commission to exercise the right of eminent domain to acquire property located within each Commonwealth required by the commission to effectuate the purposes of this compact.

ARTICLE IV.

The commission shall select from among its members a chairman and a vice chairman, and may select from among its members a secretary and treasurer or may designate other persons to fill these positions. It may appoint, and at its pleasure remove or discharge, such officers and legal, clerical, expert and other assistants and employees as may be required to carry the provisions of this compact into effect, and shall fix and determine their duties, qualifications and compensation. It may establish and maintain one or more offices for the transaction of its business, and may meet at any time or place. A majority of the commissioners present shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The commissioners shall serve without compensation, but shall be paid their expenses incurred in and incident to the performance of their duties. They shall take the oath of office required of officers of their respective states.

ARTICLE V.

Each Commonwealth agrees that the officers and departments of each will be authorized to do all things falling within their respective jurisdictions necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular. The commission shall be entitled to the services of any state officer or agency in the same manner as any other department or agency of this state. The commission shall keep accurate records, showing in full its receipts and disbursements, and said records shall be open at any reasonable time to the inspection of such representatives of the two Commonwealths as may be duly constituted for that purpose. The commission shall submit annually and at other times as required such reports as may be required by the laws of each Commonwealth or by the Governor thereof.

ARTICLE VI.

The cost of acquiring land and other property required in the development and operation of The Breaks Interstate Park and constructing, maintaining and operating improvements and facilities therein and equipping same may be defrayed by funds received from appropriations, gifts, the use of money received as fees or charges for the use of said park and facilities, or by the issuance of revenue bonds, or by a combination of such sources of funds. The commission may charge for admission to said park, or make other charges deemed appropriate by it and shall have the use of funds so received for park purposes. The commission is authorized to issue revenue bonds, which shall not be obligations of either state, pursuant to procedures which shall be in substantial compliance with the provisions of laws of either or both states governing the issuance of revenue bonds by governmental agencies.

ARTICLE VII.

All money, securities and other property, real and personal, received by way of gift or otherwise or revenue received from its operations may be retained by the commission and used for the development, maintenance and operation of the Park or for other Park purposes.

The commission shall not pledge the credit of either Commonwealth except by and with the authority of the General Assembly thereof.

ARTICLE VIII.

This compact may be amended from time to time by the concurrent action of the two Commonwealth parties hereto.

148.225.
Lieutenant Governor to be member of board.

One (1) of the four (4) members of the Breaks Interstate Park Commission appointed by the Governor pursuant to Article II of the compact set forth in KRS 148.220 shall be the Lieutenant Governor.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 141, § 10, effective July 15, 1980; 1994, ch. 22, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

148.230.
State agencies to cooperate with Breaks Interstate Park Commission — Powers of State Property and Buildings Commission.

All governmental agencies of the Commonwealth of Kentucky are authorized to cooperate with the Breaks Interstate Park Commission created by the compact approved by KRS 148.220, it being the policy of this Commonwealth to perform and carry out the compact and to accomplish the purposes thereof.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet is authorized to allot funds appropriated by the General Assembly and the State Property and Buildings Commission is authorized to make appropriations to the Breaks Interstate Park Commission for the same purposes it is authorized to make expenditures for other state agencies. Either the State Property and Buildings Commission or the Breaks Interstate Park Commission may exercise the right of eminent domain on behalf of the Commonwealth of Kentucky in acquiring land or other property required in the establishment or enlargement of the Breaks Interstate Park.

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 82, § 2; 1964, ch. 98, § 2; 1964, ch. 157, § 18; 1968, ch. 152, § 111; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, §§ 9(1).

148.231.
State agencies to cooperate with Breaks Interstate Park Commission, powers of agencies. [Repealed.]

148.235.
Breaks Interstate Park Commission may condemn land — Conveyances by state to commission.

The Breaks Interstate Park Commission may acquire by condemnation in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky such lands lying within this state as may be necessary to be acquired for purposes of the Breaks Interstate Park. Deeds to land in this state comprising the Breaks Interstate Park shall be in the name of the Breaks Interstate Park Commission, KRS 56.030 notwithstanding. Subject to the approval of the Governor, the State Property and Buildings Commission is hereby empowered to convey by deed to the Breaks Interstate Park Commission all right, title and interest of the Commonwealth in and to all real property now held in behalf of this Commonwealth and comprising the Breaks Interstate Park.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 99; 1976, ch. 140, § 64.

148.240.
Statue of Alben W. Barkley. [Repealed.]

148.241.
Compact for Falls of the Ohio Interstate Park.

The Falls of the Ohio Interstate Park Compact is hereby enacted into law and entered into by this state with the state of Indiana, in the form substantially as follows:

History.
Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 8, § 1.

FALLS OF THE OHIO INTERSTATE PARK COMPACT

ARTICLE I.

The State of Indiana and the Commonwealth of Kentucky agree to create, develop and operate an interstate park to be known as Falls of the Ohio Interstate Park, which shall be located along the Ohio River at the Falls of the Ohio and on adjacent areas in Clark and Floyd Counties, Indiana, and Jefferson County, Kentucky. Said park shall be of such area and of such character as may be determined by the commission created by this compact.

ARTICLE II.

There is hereby created The Falls of the Ohio Interstate Park Commission, which shall be a body corporate with the powers and duties set forth herein and such additional powers as may be conferred upon it by subsequent action of the appropriate authorities of Indiana and Kentucky. The commission shall consist of three commissioners from each of the two states, each of whom shall be a citizen of the state he shall represent. Members of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor. Vacancies shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term. The term of one of the first commissioners appointed shall be for two years, the term of another for three years, and the term of the third for four years. Their successors shall be appointed for terms of four years each. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor is appointed and qualified. An officer or employee of the state, a political subdivision or the United States government may be appointed a commissioner under this compact.

ARTICLE III.

The commission created herein shall be a joint corporate instrumentality of both the State of Indiana and the Commonwealth of Kentucky for the purpose of effecting the objects of this compact, and shall be deemed to be performing governmental functions of the two states in the performance of its duties hereunder. The commission shall have power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, to use a common seal and to make and adopt suitable bylaws, rules and regulations. The commission shall have the authority to acquire by gift, purchase or otherwise real estate and other property, and to dispose of such real estate and other property. Each state agrees that it will exercise the right of eminent domain to acquire property located within each state required by the commission to effectuate the purposes of this compact.

ARTICLE IV.

The commission shall select from among its members a chairman and a vice chairman, and may select from among its members a secretary and treasurer or may designate other persons to fill these positions. It may appoint, and at its pleasure remove or discharge, such officers and legal, clerical, expert and other assistants and employees as may be required to carry the provisions of this compact into effect, and shall fix and determine their duties, qualifications and compensation. It may establish and maintain one or more offices for the transaction of its business, and may meet at any time or place. A majority of the commissioners present shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The commissioners shall serve without compensation, but shall be paid their expenses incurred in and incident to the performance of their duties. They shall take the oath of office required of officers of their respective states.

ARTICLE V.

Each state agrees that the officers and departments of each will be authorized to do all things falling within their respective jurisdictions necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular. The commission shall be entitled to the services of any state officer or agency in the same manner as any other department or agency of this state. The commission shall keep accurate records, showing in full its receipts and disbursements, and said records shall be open at any reasonable time to the inspection of such representative of the two states as may be duly constituted for that purpose. The commission shall submit annually and at other times as required such reports as may be required by the laws of each state or by the Governor thereof.

ARTICLE VI.

The cost of acquiring land and other property required in the development and operation of the Falls of the Ohio Interstate Park and constructing, maintaining and operating improvements and facilities therein and equipping same may be defrayed by funds received from appropriations, gifts, the use of money received as fees or charges for the use of said park and facilities, or by the issuance of revenue bonds, or by a combination of such sources of funds. The commission may charge for admission to said park, or make other charges deemed appropriate by it and shall have the use of funds so received for park purposes. The commission is authorized to issue revenue bonds, which shall not be obligations of either state, pursuant to procedures which shall be in substantial compliance with the provisions of laws of either or both states governing the issuance of revenue bonds by governmental agencies.

ARTICLE VII.

All money, securities and other property, real and personal, received by way of gift or otherwise or revenue received from its operations may be retained by the commission and used for the development, maintenance and operation of the park or for other park purposes.

The commission shall not pledge the credit of either state except by and with the authority of the General Assembly thereof.

ARTICLE VIII.

This compact may be amended from time to time by the concurrent action of the two states parties hereto.

The compact approved herein shall become effective upon ratification and approval of the compact by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana and upon approval of this compact by the Congress of the United States.

148.242.
Lieutenant Governor to be member of board.

One (1) of the three (3) members of the Falls of the Ohio Interstate Park Commission appointed by the Governor pursuant to Article II of the compact set forth in KRS 148.241 shall be the Lieutenant Governor.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 141, § 10, effective July 15, 1980.

148.250.
Thoroughbred State Park.

There may be a state park at a site to be selected by the commissioner of parks in Fayette County, Kentucky, which park shall be known as Thoroughbred State Park. It shall be developed for recreational and educational purposes, in commemoration of the influence of the Thoroughbred horse industry on the history and traditions of the Commonwealth. It shall include restaurant facilities for visitors and a museum of the Thoroughbred industry.

History.
Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 179, § 1.

148.255.
Legislative approval required for disposal of certain park property.

No interest in real property that is located in a county containing a consolidated local government and that is owned by the Commonwealth and managed by the Kentucky Department of Parks and having a value greater than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) shall be sold, traded, or otherwise disposed of without prior authorization by the General Assembly.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 145, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

148.257.
Interim state employees designated as craftspersons — Permission to sell.

Notwithstanding KRS 11A.020, 11A.040, and 45A.340, or any other law to the contrary, the commissioner may designate as a craftsperson any interim state employee whose duties consist primarily of craft-making demonstrations and who has been juried by a craft jury.

Persons designated as craftspersons under subsection (1) of this section may sell craft products to gift shops operated by the Department of Parks, provided that the products are made from materials that have not been purchased with state funds.

History.
Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 68, § 3, effective July 12, 2006.